Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 44 Farm and Ranch Operations

§ 11-44-101.
Short title.

This chapter is known
and may be cited as the “Wyoming Right to Farm and Ranch Act”.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 58, § 1.

§ 11-44-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Farm and ranch” means the land, buildings, livestock and machinery used in the commercial production and sale of farm and ranch products;

“Farm or ranch operation” means the science and art of production of plants and animals useful to man except those listed under W.S.

23-1-101

, including, but not limited to, the preparation of these products for man’s use and their disposal by marketing or otherwise, and includes horticulture, floriculture, viticulture, silviculture, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee and any and all forms of farm and ranch products and farm and ranch production;

“This act” means W.S.

11-44-101

through

11-44-104

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 58, § 1; 1999, ch. 60, § 1; 2015 ch. 175, § 2, effective March 9, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(iii), substituted “11-44-103” for “11-44-104”.

Law 2015, ch. 174, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-44-103.
Farm or ranch operations not considered a nuisance; conditions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a farm or ranch operation shall not be found to be a public or private nuisance by reason of that operation if that farm or ranch operation:

Conforms to generally accepted agricultural management practices; and

Existed before a change in the land use adjacent to the farm or ranch land and the farm or ranch operation would not have been a nuisance before the change in land use or occupancy occurred.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 58, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Reed v. Cloninger, 2006 WY 37, 131 P.3d 359,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. Mar. 24, 2006).

§ 11-44-104.
Right to farm.

To protect agriculture as a vital part of the economy of Wyoming, the rights of farmers and ranchers to engage in farm or ranch operations shall be forever guaranteed in this state.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify any provision of common law or statutes relating to trespass, eminent domain, existing or previously enacted laws or rules or any other property rights.

As used in this section “farm and ranch operations” includes any farm or ranch practice recognized as generally accepted under the provisions of W.S.

11-44-103

and any agricultural or livestock management practice recognized as generally accepted under the provisions of W.S.

11-29-115

.

History.

2015 ch. 175, § 1, effective March 9, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 175, § 1 makes the act effective March 9, 2015.